Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.880

Cooperation with governmental agencies and private associations.

The director may cooperate with and enter into agreements with governmental agencies of this state, other states, agencies of the federal government, and private associations in order to carry out the purpose and provisions of this chapter and the United States Warehouse Act (7 USCA § 241 et seq.) and the United States Grain Standards Act, as amended (7 USCA § 71, et seq.). Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter such agreements may also relate to a joint program for licensing, bonding, and inspecting stations. Such a program should be designed to avoid duplication of effort on the part of the licensing authority and requirements for operation, and promote more efficient enforcement of the provisions of this chapter and comparable provisions of the law of the states of Idaho or Oregon.

[ 1983 c 305 s 55; 1979 ex.s. c 238 s 22; 1963 c 124 s 55. Formerly RCW 22.09.550.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.